Illinois, session 104th, SB3404.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by adding 5Sections 3-144.3, 3-144.4, 4-138.15, 4-138.16, 5-218.5, 65-218.6, 6-213.5, 6-213.6, 8-244.5, 8-244.6, 9-134.6, 9-134.7, 710-104.6, 10-104.7, 11-223.5, 11-223.6, 12-133.8, 12-133.9, 817-120.5, and 17-120.6 as follows: 9    (40 ILCS 5/3-144.3 new)10    Sec. 3-144.3. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 11of any pension benefit.12    (a) As used in this Section:13    "Eligible person" means a person who:14        (1) has terminated service;15        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 16    eligible to receive a retirement pension under this 17    Article;18        (3) has not received any retirement pension under this 19    Article; and20        (4) has not made the election under Section 3-144.4.21    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 22or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 23anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is   SB3404 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 2"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's or 3disability benefits.4    (b) If an employer has elected to provide funding for an 5accelerated pension benefit program, then as soon as practical 6after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical after the employer 7has made that election, whichever is later, the fund shall 8calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 9adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 10for each eligible person who requests that information and 11shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 12irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the fund 13to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 14benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 15shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 16receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 17subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 18person is limited to one calculation and offer per fiscal 19year. The fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 20eligible person to notify him or her of the election.21    Until June 30, 2028, an eligible person may irrevocably 22elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 23amount that the fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 24receiving any pension benefit.25    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 26be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated   SB3404 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 2benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 3terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 4survivor, or other benefit.5    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 6benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 7under this Article, then:8        (1) Any benefits under the fund earned as a result of 9    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 10    person's creditable service arising from the return to 11    active service.12        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 13    repaid to the fund, and the terminated creditable service 14    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.15    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 16benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 17be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 18account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 19Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 20taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 21receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 22Section must direct the fund to pay all of that payment as a 23rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 24under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.25    (f) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 26receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this   SB3404 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1Section, the fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 2of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 3from the contribution remitted by the employer for that 4purpose. Moneys remitted to the fund for the purpose of the 5accelerated pension benefit program must be kept in a separate 6account. If the fund determines it does not have sufficient 7moneys to make the accelerated pension benefit payment, then 8the fund shall not accept the member's irrevocable election 9and shall notify the member of that fact. The member may 10reapply for the accelerated pension benefit payment after that 11fiscal year. Elections shall be processed and paid in the 12order in which complete applications are received by the fund, 13subject to the availability of funds. If the fund accepts the 14member's irrevocable election to receive an accelerated 15pension benefit payment under this Section, then the fund 16shall transfer, from the moneys remitted to the fund for that 17purpose, the amount of the accelerated pension benefit payment 18into the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified 19account. If any moneys remain in the account maintained by the 20fund for the purpose of the accelerated pension benefit 21program at the end of the fiscal year, the fund must remit 22those moneys back to the employer within one month after the 23end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies the fund 24at least one month before the end of the fiscal year that the 25funds shall remain in the account to be used for the subsequent 26fiscal year.  SB3404 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 2rules, necessary to implement this Section.3    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 4way that would cause the applicable fund to cease to be a 5qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 6    (40 ILCS 5/3-144.4 new)7    Sec. 3-144.4. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 8reduction in annual retirement pension increases.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump sum 11payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 12the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 13pension using the formula applicable to the Tier 1 member and 14the present value of the automatic annual increases to the 15Tier 1 member's retirement pension using the formula provided 16under subsection (b-5).17    "Eligible person" means a person who:18        (1) is a Tier 1 member;19        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 20    pension under this Article;21        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 22    receiving a retirement pension under this Article;23        (4) has not received any retirement pension under this 24    Article; and25        (5) has not made the election under Section 3-144.3.  SB3404 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a police 2officer under this Article before January 1, 2011.3    (b) Until June 30, 2028, if an employer elects to provide 4funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, then as 5soon as practical after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical 6after the employer makes that election, whichever is later, 7the fund shall implement an accelerated pension benefit 8payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request of an 9eligible person, if the employer has elected to provide 10funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, the fund 11shall calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 12adopted by the Board, an accelerated pension benefit payment 13amount and shall offer that eligible person the opportunity to 14irrevocably elect to have his or her automatic annual 15increases in retirement pension calculated in accordance with 16the formula provided under subsection (b-5) in exchange for 17the accelerated pension benefit payment. The election under 18this subsection must be made before the eligible person 19receives the first payment of a retirement pension otherwise 20payable under this Article. An eligible person is limited to 21one calculation and offer per fiscal year.22    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 23retirement pension of a person who made the election under 24subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 25January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 26or the first anniversary of the pension start date, whichever   SB3404 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 2the originally granted retirement pension.3    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 4benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 5then:6        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 7    increase in retirement pension shall be calculated in 8    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 9    (b-5); and10        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 11    repaid to the fund.12    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 13benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 14be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 15account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 16Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 17taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 18receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 19Section must direct the fund to pay all of that payment as a 20rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 21under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.22    (d-5) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 23receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 24Section, the fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 25of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 26from the contribution remitted by the employer for that   SB3404 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1purpose. Moneys remitted to the fund for the purpose of this 2program must be kept in a separate account. If the fund 3determines it does not have sufficient moneys to make the 4accelerated pension benefit payment, then the fund shall not 5accept the member's irrevocable election and shall notify the 6member of that fact. The member may reapply for the 7accelerated pension benefit payment after that fiscal year. 8Elections shall be processed and paid in the order in which 9complete applications are received by the fund, subject to the 10availability of funds. If the fund accepts the member's 11irrevocable election to receive an accelerated pension benefit 12payment under this Section, then the fund shall transfer, from 13the moneys remitted to the fund for that purpose, the amount of 14the accelerated pension benefit payment into the member's 15eligible retirement plan or qualified account. If any moneys 16remain in the account at the end of the fiscal year, the fund 17must remit those moneys back to the employer within one month 18after the end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies 19the fund at least one month before the end of the fiscal year 20that the funds shall remain in the account to be used for the 21accelerated pension benefit program for the subsequent fiscal 22year.23    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 24rules, necessary to implement this Section.25    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 26way that would cause the applicable fund to cease to be a   SB3404 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 2    (40 ILCS 5/4-138.15 new)3    Sec. 4-138.15. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 4of any pension benefit.5    (a) As used in this Section:6    "Eligible person" means a person who:7        (1) has terminated service;8        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 9    eligible to receive a retirement pension under this 10    Article;11        (3) has not received any retirement pension under this 12    Article; and13        (4) has not made the election under Section 4-138.16.14    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 15or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 16anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 17entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 18"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's or 19disability benefits.20    (b) If an employer has elected to provide funding for an 21accelerated pension benefit program, then as soon as practical 22after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical after the employer 23has made that election, whichever is later, the fund shall 24calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 25adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits   SB3404 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1for each eligible person who requests that information and 2shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 3irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the fund 4to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 5benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 6shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 7receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 8subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 9person is limited to one calculation and offer per fiscal 10year. The fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 11eligible person to notify him or her of the election.12    Until June 30, 2028, an eligible person may irrevocably 13elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 14amount that the fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 15receiving any pension benefit.16    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 17be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 18pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 19benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 20terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 21survivor, or other benefit.22    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 23benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 24under this Article, then:25        (1) Any benefits under the fund earned as a result of 26    that return to active service shall be based solely on the   SB3404 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    person's creditable service arising from the return to 2    active service.3        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 4    repaid to the fund, and the terminated creditable service 5    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.6    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 7benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 8be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 9account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 10Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 11taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 12receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 13Section must direct the fund to pay all of that payment as a 14rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 15under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.16    (f) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 17receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 18Section, the fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 19of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 20from the contribution remitted by the employer for that 21purpose. Moneys remitted to the fund for the purpose of the 22accelerated pension benefit program must be kept in a separate 23account. If the fund determines it does not have sufficient 24moneys to make the accelerated pension benefit payment, then 25the fund shall not accept the member's irrevocable election 26and shall notify the member of that fact. The member may   SB3404 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1reapply for the accelerated pension benefit payment after that 2fiscal year. Elections shall be processed and paid in the 3order in which complete applications are received by the fund, 4subject to the availability of funds. If the fund accepts the 5member's irrevocable election to receive an accelerated 6pension benefit payment under this Section, then the fund 7shall transfer, from the moneys remitted to the fund for that 8purpose, the amount of the accelerated pension benefit payment 9into the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified 10account. If any moneys remain in the account maintained by the 11fund for the purpose of the accelerated pension benefit 12program at the end of the fiscal year, the fund must remit 13those moneys back to the employer within one month after the 14end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies the fund 15at least one month before the end of the fiscal year that the 16funds shall remain in the account to be used for the subsequent 17fiscal year.18    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 19rules, necessary to implement this Section.20    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 21way that would cause the applicable fund to cease to be a 22qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 23    (40 ILCS 5/4-138.16 new)24    Sec. 4-138.16. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 25reduction in annual retirement pension increases.  SB3404 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    (a) As used in this Section:2    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump sum 3payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 4the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 5pension using the formula applicable to the Tier 1 member and 6the present value of the automatic annual increases to the 7Tier 1 member's retirement pension using the formula provided 8under subsection (b-5).9    "Eligible person" means a person who:10        (1) is a Tier 1 member;11        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 12    pension under this Article;13        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 14    receiving a retirement pension under this Article;15        (4) has not received any retirement pension under this 16    Article; and17        (5) has not made the election under Section 4-138.15.18    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a 19firefighter before January 1, 2011.20    (b) Until June 30, 2028, if an employer elects to provide 21funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, then as 22soon as practical after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical 23after the employer makes that election, whichever is later, 24the fund shall implement an accelerated pension benefit 25payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request of an 26eligible person, if the employer has elected to provide   SB3404 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, the fund 2shall calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 3adopted by the Board, an accelerated pension benefit payment 4amount and shall offer that eligible person the opportunity to 5irrevocably elect to have his or her automatic annual 6increases in retirement pension calculated in accordance with 7the formula provided under subsection (b-5) in exchange for 8the accelerated pension benefit payment. The election under 9this subsection must be made before the eligible person 10receives the first payment of a retirement pension otherwise 11payable under this Article. An eligible person is limited to 12one calculation and offer per fiscal year.13    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 14retirement pension of a person who made the election under 15subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 16January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 17or the first anniversary of the pension start date, whichever 18is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 19the originally granted retirement pension.20    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 21benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 22then:23        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 24    increase in retirement pension shall be calculated in 25    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 26    (b-5); and  SB3404 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 2    repaid to the fund.3    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 4benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 5be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 6account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 7Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 8taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 9receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 10Section must direct the fund to pay all of that payment as a 11rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 12under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.13    (d-5) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 14receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 15Section, the fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 16of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 17from the contribution remitted by the employer for that 18purpose. Moneys remitted to the fund for the purpose of this 19program must be kept in a separate account. If the fund 20determines it does not have sufficient moneys to make the 21accelerated pension benefit payment, then the fund shall not 22accept the member's irrevocable election and shall notify the 23member of that fact. The member may reapply for the 24accelerated pension benefit payment after that fiscal year. 25Elections shall be processed and paid in the order in which 26complete applications are received by the fund, subject to the   SB3404 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1availability of funds. If the fund accepts the member's 2irrevocable election to receive an accelerated pension benefit 3payment under this Section, then the fund shall transfer, from 4the moneys remitted to the fund for that purpose, the amount of 5the accelerated pension benefit payment into the member's 6eligible retirement plan or qualified account. If any moneys 7remain in the account at the end of the fiscal year, the fund 8must remit those moneys back to the employer within one month 9after the end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies 10the fund at least one month before the end of the fiscal year 11that the funds shall remain in the account to be used for the 12accelerated pension benefit program for the subsequent fiscal 13year.14    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 15rules, necessary to implement this Section.16    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 17way that would cause the applicable fund to cease to be a 18qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 19    (40 ILCS 5/5-218.5 new)20    Sec. 5-218.5. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 21of any pension benefit.22    (a) As used in this Section:23    "Eligible person" means a person who:24        (1) has terminated service;25        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be   SB3404 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    eligible to receive a retirement annuity under this 2    Article;3        (3) has not received any retirement annuity under this 4    Article; and5        (4) has not made the election under Section 5-218.6.6    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 7or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 8anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 9entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 10"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's or 11disability benefits.12    (b) If an employer has elected to provide funding for an 13accelerated pension benefit program, then as soon as practical 14after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical after the employer 15has made that election, whichever is later, the Fund shall 16calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 17adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 18for each eligible person who requests that information and 19shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 20irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the Fund 21to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 22benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 23shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 24receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 25subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 26person is limited to one calculation and offer per fiscal   SB3404 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1year. The Fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 2eligible person to notify him or her of the election.3    Until June 30, 2028, an eligible person may irrevocably 4elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 5amount that the Fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 6receiving any pension benefit.7    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 8be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 9pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 10benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 11terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 12survivor, or other benefit.13    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 14benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 15under this Article, then:16        (1) Any benefits under the Fund earned as a result of 17    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 18    person's creditable service arising from the return to 19    active service.20        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 21    repaid to the Fund, and the terminated creditable service 22    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.23    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 24benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 25be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 26account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this   SB3404 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 2taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 3receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 4Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 5rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 6under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.7    (f) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 8receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 9Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 10of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 11from the contribution remitted by the employer for that 12purpose. Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of the 13accelerated pension benefit program must be kept in a separate 14account. If the Fund determines it does not have sufficient 15moneys to make the accelerated pension benefit payment, then 16the Fund shall not accept the member's irrevocable election 17and shall notify the member of that fact. The member may 18reapply for the accelerated pension benefit payment after that 19fiscal year. Elections shall be processed and paid in the 20order in which complete applications are received by the Fund, 21subject to the availability of funds. If the Fund accepts the 22member's irrevocable election to receive an accelerated 23pension benefit payment under this Section, then the Fund 24shall transfer, from the moneys remitted to the Fund for that 25purpose, the amount of the accelerated pension benefit payment 26into the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified   SB3404 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1account. If any moneys remain in the account maintained by the 2Fund for the purpose of the accelerated pension benefit 3program at the end of the fiscal year, the Fund must remit 4those moneys back to the employer within one month after the 5end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies the Fund 6at least one month before the end of the fiscal year that the 7funds shall remain in the account to be used for the subsequent 8fiscal year.9    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 10rules, necessary to implement this Section.11    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 12way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 13under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 14    (40 ILCS 5/5-218.6 new)15    Sec. 5-218.6. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 16reduction in annual retirement annuity increases.17    (a) As used in this Section:18    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump sum 19payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 20the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 21annuity and survivor's annuity using the formula applicable to 22the Tier 1 member and the present value of the automatic annual 23increases to the Tier 1 member's retirement annuity using the 24formula provided under subsection (b-5).25    "Eligible person" means a person who:  SB3404 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1        (1) is a Tier 1 member;2        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 3    annuity under this Article;4        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 5    receiving a retirement annuity under this Article;6        (4) has not received any retirement annuity under this 7    Article; and8        (5) has not made the election under Section 5-218.5.9    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a 10policeman before January 1, 2011.11    (b) Until June 30, 2028, if an employer elects to provide 12funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, then as 13soon as practical after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical 14after the employer makes that election, whichever is later, 15the Fund shall implement an accelerated pension benefit 16payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request of an 17eligible person, if the employer has elected to provide 18funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, the Fund 19shall calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 20adopted by the Board, an accelerated pension benefit payment 21amount and shall offer that eligible person the opportunity to 22irrevocably elect to have his or her automatic annual 23increases in retirement pension calculated in accordance with 24the formula provided under subsection (b-5) in exchange for 25the accelerated pension benefit payment. The election under 26this subsection must be made before the eligible person   SB3404 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1receives the first payment of a retirement pension otherwise 2payable under this Article. An eligible person is limited to 3one calculation and offer per fiscal year.4    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 5retirement annuity of a person who made the election under 6subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 7January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 8or the first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever 9is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 10the originally granted retirement annuity.11    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 12benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 13then:14        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 15    increase in retirement annuity shall be calculated in 16    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 17    (b-5); and18        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 19    repaid to the Fund.20    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 21benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 22be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 23account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 24Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 25taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 26receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this   SB3404 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 2rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 3under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.4    (d-5) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 5receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 6Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 7of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 8from the contribution remitted by the employer for that 9purpose. Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of this 10program must be kept in a separate account. If the Fund 11determines it does not have sufficient moneys to make the 12accelerated pension benefit payment, then the Fund shall not 13accept the member's irrevocable election and shall notify the 14member of that fact. The member may reapply for the 15accelerated pension benefit payment after that fiscal year. 16Elections shall be processed and paid in the order in which 17complete applications are received by the Fund, subject to the 18availability of funds. If the Fund accepts the member's 19irrevocable election to receive an accelerated pension benefit 20payment under this Section, then the Fund shall transfer, from 21the moneys remitted to the Fund for that purpose, the amount of 22the accelerated pension benefit payment into the member's 23eligible retirement plan or qualified account. If any moneys 24remain in the account at the end of the fiscal year, the Fund 25must remit those moneys back to the employer within one month 26after the end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies   SB3404 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1the Fund at least one month before the end of the fiscal year 2that the funds shall remain in the account to be used for the 3accelerated pension benefit program for the subsequent fiscal 4year.5    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 6rules, necessary to implement this Section.7    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 8way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 9under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 10    (40 ILCS 5/6-213.5 new)11    Sec. 6-213.5. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 12of any pension benefit.13    (a) As used in this Section:14    "Eligible person" means a person who:15        (1) has terminated service;16        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 17    eligible to receive a retirement annuity under this 18    Article;19        (3) has not received any retirement annuity under this 20    Article; and21        (4) has not made the election under Section 6-213.6.22    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 23or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 24anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 25entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age.   SB3404 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's or 2disability benefits.3    (b) If an employer has elected to provide funding for an 4accelerated pension benefit program, then as soon as practical 5after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical after the employer 6has made that election, whichever is later, the Fund shall 7calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 8adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 9for each eligible person who requests that information and 10shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 11irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the Fund 12to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 13benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 14shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 15receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 16subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 17person is limited to one calculation and offer per fiscal 18year. The Fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 19eligible person to notify him or her of the election.20    Until June 30, 2028, an eligible person may irrevocably 21elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 22amount that the Fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 23receiving any pension benefit.24    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 25be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 26pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other   SB3404 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 2terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 3survivor, or other benefit.4    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 5benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 6under this Article, then:7        (1) Any benefits under the Fund earned as a result of 8    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 9    person's creditable service arising from the return to 10    active service.11        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 12    repaid to the Fund, and the terminated creditable service 13    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.14    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 15benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 16be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 17account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 18Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 19taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 20receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 21Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 22rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 23under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.24    (f) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 25receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 26Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount   SB3404 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 2from the contribution remitted by the employer for that 3purpose. Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of the 4accelerated pension benefit program must be kept in a separate 5account. If the Fund determines it does not have sufficient 6moneys to make the accelerated pension benefit payment, then 7the Fund shall not accept the member's irrevocable election 8and shall notify the member of that fact. The member may 9reapply for the accelerated pension benefit payment after that 10fiscal year. Elections shall be processed and paid in the 11order in which complete applications are received by the Fund, 12subject to the availability of funds. If the Fund accepts the 13member's irrevocable election to receive an accelerated 14pension benefit payment under this Section, then the Fund 15shall transfer, from the moneys remitted to the Fund for that 16purpose, the amount of the accelerated pension benefit payment 17into the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified 18account. If any moneys remain in the account maintained by the 19Fund for the purpose of the accelerated pension benefit 20program at the end of the fiscal year, the Fund must remit 21those moneys back to the employer within one month after the 22end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies the Fund 23at least one month before the end of the fiscal year that the 24funds shall remain in the account to be used for the subsequent 25fiscal year.26    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency   SB3404 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1rules, necessary to implement this Section.2    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 3way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 4under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 5    (40 ILCS 5/6-213.6 new)6    Sec. 6-213.6. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 7reduction in annual retirement annuity increases.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump sum 10payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 11the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 12annuity and survivor's annuity using the formula applicable to 13the Tier 1 member and the present value of the automatic annual 14increases to the Tier 1 member's retirement annuity using the 15formula provided under subsection (b-5). "Eligible person" 16means a person who:17        (1) is a Tier 1 member;18        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 19    annuity under this Article;20        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 21    receiving a retirement annuity under this Article;22        (4) has not received any retirement annuity under this 23    Article; and24        (5) has not made the election under Section 6-213.5.25    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a fireman   SB3404 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1under this Article before January 1, 2011.2    (b) Until June 30, 2028, if an employer elects to provide 3funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, then as 4soon as practical after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical 5after the employer makes that election, whichever is later, 6the Fund shall implement an accelerated pension benefit 7payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request of an 8eligible person, if the employer has elected to provide 9funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, the Fund 10shall calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 11adopted by the Board, an accelerated pension benefit payment 12amount and shall offer that eligible person the opportunity to 13irrevocably elect to have his or her automatic annual 14increases in retirement pension calculated in accordance with 15the formula provided under subsection (b-5) in exchange for 16the accelerated pension benefit payment. The election under 17this subsection must be made before the eligible person 18receives the first payment of a retirement pension otherwise 19payable under this Article. An eligible person is limited to 20one calculation and offer per fiscal year.21    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 22retirement annuity of a person who made the election under 23subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 24January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 25or the first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever 26is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of   SB3404 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1the originally granted retirement annuity.2    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 3benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 4then:5        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 6    increase in retirement annuity shall be calculated in 7    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 8    (b-5); and9        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 10    repaid to the Fund.11    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 12benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 13be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 14account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 15Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 16taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 17receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 18Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 19rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 20under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.21    (d-5) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 22receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 23Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 24of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 25from the contribution remitted by the employer for that 26purpose. Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of this   SB3404 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1program must be kept in a separate account. If the Fund 2determines it does not have sufficient moneys to make the 3accelerated pension benefit payment, then the Fund shall not 4accept the member's irrevocable election and shall notify the 5member of that fact. The member may reapply for the 6accelerated pension benefit payment after that fiscal year. 7Elections shall be processed and paid in the order in which 8complete applications are received by the Fund, subject to the 9availability of funds. If the Fund accepts the member's 10irrevocable election to receive an accelerated pension benefit 11payment under this Section, then the Fund shall transfer, from 12the moneys remitted to the Fund for that purpose, the amount of 13the accelerated pension benefit payment into the member's 14eligible retirement plan or qualified account. If any moneys 15remain in the account at the end of the fiscal year, the Fund 16must remit those moneys back to the employer within one month 17after the end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies 18the Fund at least one month before the end of the fiscal year 19that the funds shall remain in the account to be used for the 20accelerated pension benefit program for the subsequent fiscal 21year.22    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 23rules, necessary to implement this Section.24    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 25way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 26under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.   SB3404 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    (40 ILCS 5/8-244.5 new)2    Sec. 8-244.5. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 3of any pension benefit.4    (a) As used in this Section:5    "Eligible person" means a person who:6        (1) has terminated service;7        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 8    eligible to receive a retirement annuity under this 9    Article;10        (3) has not received any retirement annuity under this 11    Article; and12        (4) has not made the election under Section 8-244.6.13    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 14or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 15anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 16entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 17"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's or 18disability benefits.19    (b) If the city has elected to provide funding for an 20accelerated pension benefit program, then as soon as practical 21after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical after the city has 22made that election, whichever is later, the Fund shall 23calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 24adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 25for each eligible person who requests that information and   SB3404 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 2irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the Fund 3to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 4benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 5shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 6receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 7subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 8person is limited to one calculation and offer per fiscal 9year. The Fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 10eligible person to notify him or her of the election.11    Until June 30, 2028, an eligible person may irrevocably 12elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 13amount that the Fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 14receiving any pension benefit. A person who elects to receive 15an accelerated pension benefit payment under this Section may 16not elect to proceed under the Retirement Systems Reciprocal 17Act with respect to service under this Article.18    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 19be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 20pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 21benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 22terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 23survivor, or other benefit.24    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 25benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 26under this Article, then:  SB3404 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1        (1) Any benefits under the Fund earned as a result of 2    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 3    person's creditable service arising from the return to 4    active service.5        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 6    repaid to the Fund, and the terminated creditable service 7    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.8    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 9benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 10be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 11account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 12Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 13taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 14receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 15Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 16rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 17under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.18    (f) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 19receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 20Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 21of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 22from the contribution remitted by the city for that purpose. 23Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of the accelerated 24pension benefit program must be kept in a separate account. If 25the Fund determines it does not have sufficient moneys to make 26the accelerated pension benefit payment, then the Fund shall   SB3404 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1not accept the member's irrevocable election and shall notify 2the member of that fact. The member may reapply for the 3accelerated pension benefit payment after that fiscal year. 4Elections shall be processed and paid in the order in which 5complete applications are received by the Fund, subject to the 6availability of funds. If the Fund accepts the member's 7irrevocable election to receive an accelerated pension benefit 8payment under this Section, then the Fund shall transfer, from 9the moneys remitted to the Fund for that purpose, the amount of 10the accelerated pension benefit payment into the member's 11eligible retirement plan or qualified account. If any moneys 12remain in the account maintained by the Fund for the purpose of 13the accelerated pension benefit program at the end of the 14fiscal year, the Fund must remit those moneys back to the city 15within one month after the end of the fiscal year, unless the 16city notifies the Fund at least one month before the end of the 17fiscal year that the funds shall remain in the account to be 18used for the subsequent fiscal year.19    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 20rules, necessary to implement this Section.21    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 22way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 23under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 24    (40 ILCS 5/8-244.6 new)25    Sec. 8-244.6. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a   SB3404 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1reduction in annual retirement annuity.2    (a) As used in this Section:3    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump sum 4payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 5the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 6annuity using the formula applicable to the Tier 1 member and 7the present value of the automatic annual increases to the 8Tier 1 member's retirement annuity using the formula provided 9under subsection (b-5).10    "Eligible person" means a person who:11        (1) is a Tier 1 member;12        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 13    annuity under this Article;14        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 15    receiving a retirement annuity under this Article;16        (4) has not received any retirement annuity under this 17    Article; and18        (5) has not made the election under Section 8-244.5.19    "Tier 1 member" means an employee who first became a 20participant under this Article or any reciprocal retirement 21system or pension fund established under this Code before 22January 1, 2011.23    (b) Until June 30, 2028, if the city elects to provide 24funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, then as 25soon as practical after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical 26after the city makes that election, whichever is later, the   SB3404 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1Fund shall implement an accelerated pension benefit payment 2option for eligible persons. Upon the request of an eligible 3person, if the city has elected to provide funding for an 4accelerated pension benefit program, the Fund shall calculate, 5using actuarial tables and other assumptions adopted by the 6Board, an accelerated pension benefit payment amount and shall 7offer that eligible person the opportunity to irrevocably 8elect to have his or her automatic annual increases in 9retirement pension calculated in accordance with the formula 10provided under subsection (b-5) in exchange for the 11accelerated pension benefit payment. The election under this 12subsection must be made before the eligible person receives 13the first payment of a retirement pension otherwise payable 14under this Article. An eligible person is limited to one 15calculation and offer per fiscal year.16    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 17retirement annuity of a person who made the election under 18subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 19January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 20or the first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever 21is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 22the originally granted retirement annuity.23    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 24benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 25then:26        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual   SB3404 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    increase in retirement annuity shall be calculated in 2    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 3    (b-5); and4        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 5    repaid to the Fund.6    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 7benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 8be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 9account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 10Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 11taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 12receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 13Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 14rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 15under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.16    (d-5) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 17receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 18Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 19of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 20from the contribution remitted by the city for that purpose. 21Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of this program 22must be kept in a separate account. If the Fund determines it 23does not have sufficient moneys to make the accelerated 24pension benefit payment, then the Fund shall not accept the 25member's irrevocable election and shall notify the member of 26that fact. The member may reapply for the accelerated pension   SB3404 Engrossed- 39 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1benefit payment after that fiscal year. Elections shall be 2processed and paid in the order in which complete applications 3are received by the Fund, subject to the availability of 4funds. If the Fund accepts the member's irrevocable election 5to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 6Section, then the Fund shall transfer, from the moneys 7remitted to the Fund for that purpose, the amount of the 8accelerated pension benefit payment into the member's eligible 9retirement plan or qualified account. If any moneys remain in 10the account at the end of the fiscal year, the Fund must remit 11those moneys back to the city within one month after the end of 12the fiscal year, unless the city notifies the Fund at least one 13month before the end of the fiscal year that the funds shall 14remain in the account to be used for the accelerated pension 15benefit program for the subsequent fiscal year.16    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 17rules, necessary to implement this Section.18    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 19way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 20under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 21    (40 ILCS 5/9-134.6 new)22    Sec. 9-134.6. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 23of any pension benefit.24    (a) As used in this Section:25    "Eligible person" means a person who:  SB3404 Engrossed- 40 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1        (1) has terminated service;2        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 3    eligible to receive a retirement annuity under this 4    Article;5        (3) has not received any retirement annuity under this 6    Article; and7        (4) has not made the election under Section 9-134.7.8    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 9or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 10anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 11entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 12"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's, 13widow's, or disability benefits.14    (b) If an employer has elected to provide funding for an 15accelerated pension benefit program, then as soon as practical 16after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical after the employer 17has made that election, whichever is later, the Fund shall 18calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 19adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 20for each eligible person who requests that information and 21shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 22irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the Fund 23to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 24benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 25shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 26receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a   SB3404 Engrossed- 41 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 2person is limited to one calculation and offer per fiscal 3year. The Fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 4eligible person to notify him or her of the election.5    Until June 30, 2028, an eligible person may irrevocably 6elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 7amount that the Fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 8receiving any pension benefit. A person who elects to receive 9an accelerated pension benefit payment under this Section may 10not elect to proceed under the Retirement Systems Reciprocal 11Act with respect to service under this Article.12    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 13be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 14pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 15benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 16terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 17survivor, or other benefit.18    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 19benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 20under this Article, then:21        (1) Any benefits under the Fund earned as a result of 22    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 23    person's creditable service arising from the return to 24    active service.25        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 26    repaid to the Fund, and the terminated creditable service   SB3404 Engrossed- 42 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.2    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 3benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 4be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 5account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 6Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 7taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 8receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 9Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 10rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 11under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.12    (f) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 13receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 14Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 15of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 16from the contribution remitted by the employer for that 17purpose. Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of the 18accelerated pension benefit program must be kept in a separate 19account. If the Fund determines it does not have sufficient 20moneys to make the accelerated pension benefit payment, then 21the Fund shall not accept the member's irrevocable election 22and shall notify the member of that fact. The member may 23reapply for the accelerated pension benefit payment after that 24fiscal year. Elections shall be processed and paid in the 25order in which complete applications are received by the Fund, 26subject to the availability of funds. If the Fund accepts the   SB3404 Engrossed- 43 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1member's irrevocable election to receive an accelerated 2pension benefit payment under this Section, then the Fund 3shall transfer, from the moneys remitted to the Fund for that 4purpose, the amount of the accelerated pension benefit payment 5into the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified 6account. If any moneys remain in the account maintained by the 7Fund for the purpose of the accelerated pension benefit 8program at the end of the fiscal year, the Fund must remit 9those moneys back to the employer within one month after the 10end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies the Fund 11at least one month before the end of the fiscal year that the 12funds shall remain in the account to be used for the subsequent 13fiscal year.14    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 15rules, necessary to implement this Section.16    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 17way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 18under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 19    (40 ILCS 5/9-134.7 new)20    Sec. 9-134.7. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 21reduction in annual retirement annuity and widow's annuity 22increases.23    (a) As used in this Section:24    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump sum 25payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of   SB3404 Engrossed- 44 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 2annuity and widow's annuity using the formula applicable to 3the Tier 1 member and the present value of the automatic annual 4increases to the Tier 1 member's retirement annuity using the 5formula provided under subsection (b-5) and widow's annuity 6using the formula provided under subsection (b-6). "Eligible 7person" means a person who:8        (1) is a Tier 1 member;9        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 10    annuity under this Article;11        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 12    receiving a retirement annuity under this Article;13        (4) has not received any retirement annuity under this 14    Article; and15        (5) has not made the election under Section 9-134.6.16    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a 17participant under this Article or any reciprocal retirement 18system or pension fund established under this Code before 19January 1, 2011.20    (b) Until June 30, 2028, if an employer elects to provide 21funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, then as 22soon as practical after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical 23after the employer makes that election, whichever is later, 24the Fund shall implement an accelerated pension benefit 25payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request of an 26eligible person, if the employer has elected to provide   SB3404 Engrossed- 45 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, the Fund 2shall calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 3adopted by the Board, an accelerated pension benefit payment 4amount and shall offer that eligible person the opportunity to 5irrevocably elect to have his or her automatic annual 6increases in retirement pension calculated in accordance with 7the formula provided under subsection (b-5) in exchange for 8the accelerated pension benefit payment. The election under 9this subsection must be made before the eligible person 10receives the first payment of a retirement pension otherwise 11payable under this Article. An eligible person is limited to 12one calculation and offer per fiscal year.13    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 14retirement annuity of a person who made the election under 15subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 16January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 17or the first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever 18is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 19the originally granted retirement annuity.20    (b-6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 21widow's annuity payable to a widow's annuity beneficiary of a 22person who made the election under subsection (b) shall be 23subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring on or 24after the first anniversary of the commencement of the 25annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 26the originally granted widow's annuity.  SB3404 Engrossed- 46 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 2benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 3then:4        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 5    increase in retirement annuity shall be calculated in 6    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 7    (b-5); and8        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 9    repaid to the Fund.10    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 11benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 12be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 13account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 14Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 15taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 16receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 17Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 18rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 19under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.20    (d-5) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 21receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 22Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 23of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 24from the contribution remitted by the employer for that 25purpose. Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of this 26program must be kept in a separate account. If the Fund   SB3404 Engrossed- 47 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1determines it does not have sufficient moneys to make the 2accelerated pension benefit payment, then the Fund shall not 3accept the member's irrevocable election and shall notify the 4member of that fact. The member may reapply for the 5accelerated pension benefit payment after that fiscal year. 6Elections shall be processed and paid in the order in which 7complete applications are received by the Fund, subject to the 8availability of funds. If the Fund accepts the member's 9irrevocable election to receive an accelerated pension benefit 10payment under this Section, then the Fund shall transfer, from 11the moneys remitted to the Fund for that purpose, the amount of 12the accelerated pension benefit payment into the member's 13eligible retirement plan or qualified account. If any moneys 14remain in the account at the end of the fiscal year, the Fund 15must remit those moneys back to the employer within one month 16after the end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies 17the Fund at least one month before the end of the fiscal year 18that the funds shall remain in the account to be used for the 19accelerated pension benefit program for the subsequent fiscal 20year.21    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 22rules, necessary to implement this Section.23    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 24way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 25under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.   SB3404 Engrossed- 48 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    (40 ILCS 5/10-104.6 new)2    Sec. 10-104.6. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 3of any pension benefit.4    (a) As used in this Section:5    "Eligible person" means a person who:6        (1) has terminated service;7        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 8    eligible to receive a retirement annuity under this 9    Article;10        (3) has not received any retirement annuity under this 11    Article; and12        (4) has not made the election under Section 10-104.7.13    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 14or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 15anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 16entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 17"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's, 18widow's, or disability benefits.19    (b) If an employer has elected to provide funding for an 20accelerated pension benefit program, then as soon as practical 21after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical after the employer 22has made that election, whichever is later, the Fund shall 23calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 24adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 25for each eligible person who requests that information and 26shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to   SB3404 Engrossed- 49 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the Fund 2to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 3benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 4shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 5receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 6subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 7person is limited to one calculation and offer per fiscal 8year. The Fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 9eligible person to notify him or her of the election.10    Until June 30, 2028, an eligible person may irrevocably 11elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 12amount that the Fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 13receiving any pension benefit. A person who elects to receive 14an accelerated pension benefit payment under this Section may 15not elect to proceed under the Retirement Systems Reciprocal 16Act with respect to service under this Article.17    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 18be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 19pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 20benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 21terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 22survivor, or other benefit.23    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 24benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 25under this Article, then:26        (1) Any benefits under the Fund earned as a result of   SB3404 Engrossed- 50 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 2    person's creditable service arising from the return to 3    active service.4        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 5    repaid to the Fund, and the terminated creditable service 6    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.7    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 8benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 9be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 10account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 11Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 12taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 13receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 14Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 15rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 16under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.17    (f) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 18receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 19Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 20of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 21from the contribution remitted by the employer for that 22purpose. Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of the 23accelerated pension benefit program must be kept in a separate 24account. If the Fund determines it does not have sufficient 25moneys to make the accelerated pension benefit payment, then 26the Fund shall not accept the member's irrevocable election   SB3404 Engrossed- 51 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1and shall notify the member of that fact. The member may 2reapply for the accelerated pension benefit payment after that 3fiscal year. Elections shall be processed and paid in the 4order in which complete applications are received by the Fund, 5subject to the availability of funds. If the Fund accepts the 6member's irrevocable election to receive an accelerated 7pension benefit payment under this Section, then the Fund 8shall transfer, from the moneys remitted to the Fund for that 9purpose, the amount of the accelerated pension benefit payment 10into the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified 11account. If any moneys remain in the account maintained by the 12Fund for the purpose of the accelerated pension benefit 13program at the end of the fiscal year, the Fund must remit 14those moneys back to the employer within one month after the 15end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies the Fund 16at least one month before the end of the fiscal year that the 17funds shall remain in the account to be used for the subsequent 18fiscal year.19    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 20rules, necessary to implement this Section.21    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 22way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 23under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 24    (40 ILCS 5/10-104.7 new)25    Sec. 10-104.7. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a   SB3404 Engrossed- 52 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1reduction in annual retirement annuity and widow's annuity 2increases.3    (a) As used in this Section:4    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump sum 5payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 6the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 7annuity and widow's annuity using the formula applicable to 8the Tier 1 member and the present value of the automatic annual 9increases to the Tier 1 member's retirement annuity using the 10formula provided under subsection (b-5) and widow's annuity 11using the formula provided under subsection (b-6). "Eligible 12person" means a person who:13        (1) is a Tier 1 member;14        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 15    annuity under this Article;16        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 17    receiving a retirement annuity under this Article;18        (4) has not received any retirement annuity under this 19    Article; and20        (5) has not made the election under Section 10-104.6.21    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a 22participant under this Article or any reciprocal retirement 23system or pension fund established under this Code before 24January 1, 2011.25    (b) Until June 30, 2028, if an employer elects to provide 26funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, then as   SB3404 Engrossed- 53 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1soon as practical after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical 2after the employer makes that election, whichever is later, 3the Fund shall implement an accelerated pension benefit 4payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request of an 5eligible person, if the employer has elected to provide 6funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, the Fund 7shall calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 8adopted by the Board, an accelerated pension benefit payment 9amount and shall offer that eligible person the opportunity to 10irrevocably elect to have his or her automatic annual 11increases in retirement annuity calculated in accordance with 12the formula provided under subsection (b-5) in exchange for 13the accelerated pension benefit payment. The election under 14this subsection must be made before the eligible person 15receives the first payment of a retirement pension otherwise 16payable under this Article. An eligible person is limited to 17one calculation and offer per fiscal year.18    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 19retirement annuity of a person who made the election under 20subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 21January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 22or the first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever 23is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 24the originally granted retirement annuity.25    (b-6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 26widow's annuity payable to a widow's annuity beneficiary of a   SB3404 Engrossed- 54 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1person who made the election under subsection (b) shall be 2subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring on or 3after the first anniversary of the commencement of the 4annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 5the originally granted widow's annuity.6    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 7benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 8then:9        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 10    increase in retirement annuity shall be calculated in 11    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 12    (b-5); and13        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 14    repaid to the Fund.15    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 16benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 17be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 18account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 19Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 20taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 21receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 22Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 23rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 24under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.25    (d-5) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 26receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this   SB3404 Engrossed- 55 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 2of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 3from the contribution remitted by the employer for that 4purpose. Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of this 5program must be kept in a separate account. If the Fund 6determines it does not have sufficient moneys to make the 7accelerated pension benefit payment, then the Fund shall not 8accept the member's irrevocable election and shall notify the 9member of that fact. The member may reapply for the 10accelerated pension benefit payment after that fiscal year. 11Elections shall be processed and paid in the order in which 12complete applications are received by the Fund, subject to the 13availability of funds. If the Fund accepts the member's 14irrevocable election to receive an accelerated pension benefit 15payment under this Section, then the Fund shall transfer, from 16the moneys remitted to the Fund for that purpose, the amount of 17the accelerated pension benefit payment into the member's 18eligible retirement plan or qualified account. If any moneys 19remain in the account at the end of the fiscal year, the Fund 20must remit those moneys back to the employer within one month 21after the end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies 22the Fund at least one month before the end of the fiscal year 23that the funds shall remain in the account to be used for the 24accelerated pension benefit program for the subsequent fiscal 25year.26    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency   SB3404 Engrossed- 56 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1rules, necessary to implement this Section.2    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 3way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 4under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 5    (40 ILCS 5/11-223.5 new)6    Sec. 11-223.5. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 7of any pension benefit.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Eligible person" means a person who:10        (1) has terminated service;11        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 12    eligible to receive a retirement annuity under this 13    Article;14        (3) has not received any retirement annuity under this 15    Article; and16        (4) has not made the election under Section 11-223.6.17    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 18or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 19anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 20entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 21"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's, 22widow's, or disability benefits.23    (b) If the city has elected to provide funding for an 24accelerated pension benefit program, then as soon as practical 25after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical after the city has   SB3404 Engrossed- 57 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1made that election, whichever is later, the Fund shall 2calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 3adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 4for each eligible person who requests that information and 5shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 6irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the Fund 7to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 8benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 9shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 10receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 11subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 12person is limited to one calculation and offer per fiscal 13year. The Fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 14eligible person to notify him or her of the election.15    Until June 30, 2028, an eligible person may irrevocably 16elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 17amount that the Fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 18receiving any pension benefit. A person who elects to receive 19an accelerated pension benefit payment under this Section may 20not elect to proceed under the Retirement Systems Reciprocal 21Act with respect to service under this Article.22    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 23be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 24pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 25benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 26terminated creditable service, including any retirement,   SB3404 Engrossed- 58 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1survivor, widow, or other benefit.2    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 3benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 4under this Article, then:5        (1) Any benefits under the Fund earned as a result of 6    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 7    person's creditable service arising from the return to 8    active service.9        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 10    repaid to the Fund, and the terminated creditable service 11    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.12    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 13benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 14be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 15account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 16Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 17taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 18receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 19Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 20rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 21under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.22    (f) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 23receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 24Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 25of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 26from the contribution remitted by the city for that purpose.   SB3404 Engrossed- 59 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of the accelerated 2pension benefit program must be kept in a separate account. If 3the Fund determines it does not have sufficient moneys to make 4the accelerated pension benefit payment, then the Fund shall 5not accept the member's irrevocable election and shall notify 6the member of that fact. The member may reapply for the 7accelerated pension benefit payment after that fiscal year. 8Elections shall be processed and paid in the order in which 9complete applications are received by the Fund, subject to the 10availability of funds. If the Fund accepts the member's 11irrevocable election to receive an accelerated pension benefit 12payment under this Section, then the Fund shall transfer, from 13the moneys remitted to the Fund for that purpose, the amount of 14the accelerated pension benefit payment into the member's 15eligible retirement plan or qualified account. If any moneys 16remain in the account maintained by the Fund for the purpose of 17the accelerated pension benefit program at the end of the 18fiscal year, the Fund must remit those moneys back to the city 19within one month after the end of the fiscal year, unless the 20city notifies the Fund at least one month before the end of the 21fiscal year that the funds shall remain in the account to be 22used for the subsequent fiscal year.23    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 24rules, necessary to implement this Section.25    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 26way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan   SB3404 Engrossed- 60 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 2    (40 ILCS 5/11-223.6 new)3    Sec. 11-223.6. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 4reduction in annual retirement annuity and widow's annuity 5increases.6    (a) As used in this Section:7    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump sum 8payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 9the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 10annuity and widow's annuity using the formula applicable to 11the Tier 1 member and the present value of the automatic annual 12increases to the Tier 1 member's retirement annuity using the 13formula provided under subsection (b-5).14    "Eligible person" means a person who:15        (1) is a Tier 1 member;16        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 17    annuity under this Article;18        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 19    receiving a retirement annuity under this Article;20        (4) has not received any retirement annuity under this 21    Article; and22        (5) has not made the election under Section 11-223.5.23    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a 24participant under this Article or any reciprocal retirement 25system or pension fund established under this Code before   SB3404 Engrossed- 61 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1January 1, 2011.2    (b) Until June 30, 2028, if the city elects to provide 3funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, then as 4soon as practical after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical 5after the city makes that election, whichever is later, the 6Fund shall implement an accelerated pension benefit payment 7option for eligible persons. Upon the request of an eligible 8person, if the city has elected to provide funding for an 9accelerated pension benefit program, the Fund shall calculate, 10using actuarial tables and other assumptions adopted by the 11Board, an accelerated pension benefit payment amount and shall 12offer that eligible person the opportunity to irrevocably 13elect to have his or her automatic annual increases in 14retirement pension calculated in accordance with the formula 15provided under subsection (b-5) in exchange for the 16accelerated pension benefit payment. The election under this 17subsection must be made before the eligible person receives 18the first payment of a retirement pension otherwise payable 19under this Article. An eligible person is limited to one 20calculation and offer per fiscal year.21    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 22retirement annuity of a person who made the election under 23subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 24January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 25or the first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever 26is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of   SB3404 Engrossed- 62 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1the originally granted retirement annuity.2    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 3benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 4then:5        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 6    increase in retirement annuity shall be calculated in 7    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 8    (b-5); and9        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 10    repaid to the Fund.11    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 12benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 13be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 14account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 15Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 16taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 17receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 18Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 19rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 20under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.21    (d-5) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 22receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 23Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 24of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 25from the contribution remitted by the city for that purpose. 26Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of this program   SB3404 Engrossed- 63 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1must be kept in a separate account. If the Fund determines it 2does not have sufficient moneys to make the accelerated 3pension benefit payment, then the Fund shall not accept the 4member's irrevocable election and shall notify the member of 5that fact. The member may reapply for the accelerated pension 6benefit payment after that fiscal year. Elections shall be 7processed and paid in the order in which complete applications 8are received by the Fund, subject to the availability of 9funds. If the Fund accepts the member's irrevocable election 10to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 11Section, then the Fund shall transfer, from the moneys 12remitted to the Fund for that purpose, the amount of the 13accelerated pension benefit payment into the member's eligible 14retirement plan or qualified account. If any moneys remain in 15the account at the end of the fiscal year, the Fund must remit 16those moneys back to the city within one month after the end of 17the fiscal year, unless the city notifies the Fund at least one 18month before the end of the fiscal year that the funds shall 19remain in the account to be used for the accelerated pension 20benefit program for the subsequent fiscal year.21    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 22rules, necessary to implement this Section.23    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 24way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 25under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.   SB3404 Engrossed- 64 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    (40 ILCS 5/12-133.8 new)2    Sec. 12-133.8. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 3of any pension benefit.4    (a) As used in this Section:5    "Eligible person" means a person who:6        (1) has terminated service;7        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 8    eligible to receive a retirement annuity under this 9    Article;10        (3) has not received any retirement annuity under this 11    Article; and12        (4) has not made the election under Section 12-133.9.13    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 14or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 15anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 16entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 17"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's, 18surviving spouse's, or disability benefits.19    (b) If the city has elected to provide funding for an 20accelerated pension benefit program, then as soon as practical 21after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical after the city has 22made that election, whichever is later, the Fund shall 23calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 24adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 25for each eligible person who requests that information and 26shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to   SB3404 Engrossed- 65 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the Fund 2to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 3benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 4shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 5receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 6subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 7person is limited to one calculation and offer per fiscal 8year. The Fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 9eligible person to notify him or her of the election.10    Until June 30, 2028, an eligible person may irrevocably 11elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 12amount that the Fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 13receiving any pension benefit. A person who elects to receive 14an accelerated pension benefit payment under this Section may 15not elect to proceed under the Retirement Systems Reciprocal 16Act with respect to service under this Article.17    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 18be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 19pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 20benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 21terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 22survivor, or other benefit.23    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 24benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 25under this Article, then:26        (1) Any benefits under the Fund earned as a result of   SB3404 Engrossed- 66 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 2    person's creditable service arising from the return to 3    active service.4        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 5    repaid to the Fund, and the terminated creditable service 6    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.7    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 8benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 9be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 10account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 11Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 12taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 13receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 14Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 15rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 16under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.17    (f) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 18receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 19Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 20of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 21from the contribution remitted by the city for that purpose. 22Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of the accelerated 23pension benefit program must be kept in a separate account. If 24the Fund determines it does not have sufficient moneys to make 25the accelerated pension benefit payment, then the Fund shall 26not accept the member's irrevocable election and shall notify   SB3404 Engrossed- 67 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1the member of that fact. The member may reapply for the 2accelerated pension benefit payment after that fiscal year. 3Elections shall be processed and paid in the order in which 4complete applications are received by the Fund, subject to the 5availability of funds. If the Fund accepts the member's 6irrevocable election to receive an accelerated pension benefit 7payment under this Section, then the Fund shall transfer, from 8the moneys remitted to the Fund for that purpose, the amount of 9the accelerated pension benefit payment into the member's 10eligible retirement plan or qualified account. If any moneys 11remain in the account maintained by the Fund for the purpose of 12the accelerated pension benefit program at the end of the 13fiscal year, the Fund must remit those moneys back to the city 14within one month after the end of the fiscal year, unless the 15city notifies the Fund at least one month before the end of the 16fiscal year that the funds shall remain in the account to be 17used for the subsequent fiscal year.18    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 19rules, necessary to implement this Section.20    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 21way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 22under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 23    (40 ILCS 5/12-133.9 new)24    Sec. 12-133.9. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 25reduction in annual retirement annuity and surviving spouse's   SB3404 Engrossed- 68 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1annuity increases.2    (a) As used in this Section:3    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump sum 4payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 5the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 6annuity and surviving spouse's annuity using the formula 7applicable to the Tier 1 member and the present value of the 8automatic annual increases to the Tier 1 member's retirement 9annuity using the formula provided under subsection (b-5) and 10surviving spouse's annuity using the formula provided under 11subsection (b-6). "Eligible person" means a person who:12        (1) is a Tier 1 member;13        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 14    annuity under this Article;15        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 16    receiving a retirement annuity under this Article;17        (4) has not received any retirement annuity under this 18    Article; and19        (5) has not made the election under Section 12-133.8.20    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a 21participant under this Article or any reciprocal retirement 22system or pension fund established under this Code before 23January 1, 2011.24    (b) Until June 30, 2028, if the city elects to provide 25funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, then as 26soon as practical after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical   SB3404 Engrossed- 69 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1after the city makes that election, whichever is later, the 2Fund shall implement an accelerated pension benefit payment 3option for eligible persons. Upon the request of an eligible 4person, if the city has elected to provide funding for an 5accelerated pension benefit program, the Fund shall calculate, 6using actuarial tables and other assumptions adopted by the 7Board, an accelerated pension benefit payment amount and shall 8offer that eligible person the opportunity to irrevocably 9elect to have his or her automatic annual increases in 10retirement pension calculated in accordance with the formula 11provided under subsection (b-5) in exchange for the 12accelerated pension benefit payment. The election under this 13subsection must be made before the eligible person receives 14the first payment of a retirement pension otherwise payable 15under this Article. An eligible person is limited to one 16calculation and offer per fiscal year.17    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 18retirement annuity of a person who made the election under 19subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 20January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 21or the first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever 22is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 23the originally granted retirement annuity.24    (b-6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 25surviving spouse's annuity payable to a surviving spouse's 26annuity beneficiary of a person who made the election under   SB3404 Engrossed- 70 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 2January 1 occurring on or after the first anniversary of the 3commencement of the annuity. Each annual increase shall be 4calculated at 1.5% of the originally granted surviving 5spouse's annuity.6    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 7benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 8then:9        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 10    increase in retirement annuity shall be calculated in 11    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 12    (b-5); and13        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 14    repaid to the Fund.15    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 16benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 17be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 18account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 19Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 20taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 21receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 22Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 23rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 24under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.25    (d-5) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 26receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this   SB3404 Engrossed- 71 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 2of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 3from the contribution remitted by the city for that purpose. 4Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of this program 5must be kept in a separate account. If the Fund determines it 6does not have sufficient moneys to make the accelerated 7pension benefit payment, then the Fund shall not accept the 8member's irrevocable election and shall notify the member of 9that fact. The member may reapply for the accelerated pension 10benefit payment after that fiscal year. Elections shall be 11processed and paid in the order in which complete applications 12are received by the Fund, subject to the availability of 13funds. If the Fund accepts the member's irrevocable election 14to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 15Section, then the Fund shall transfer, from the moneys 16remitted to the Fund for that purpose, the amount of the 17accelerated pension benefit payment into the member's eligible 18retirement plan or qualified account. If any moneys remain in 19the account at the end of the fiscal year, the Fund must remit 20those moneys back to the city within one month after the end of 21the fiscal year, unless the city notifies the Fund at least one 22month before the end of the fiscal year that the funds shall 23remain in the account to be used for the accelerated pension 24benefit program for the subsequent fiscal year.25    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 26rules, necessary to implement this Section.  SB3404 Engrossed- 72 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 2way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 3under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 4    (40 ILCS 5/17-120.5 new)5    Sec. 17-120.5. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 6of any pension benefit. 7    (a) As used in this Section:8    "Eligible person" means a person who:9        (1) has terminated service;10        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 11    eligible to receive a retirement annuity under this 12    Article;13        (3) has not received any retirement annuity under this 14    Article; and15        (4) has not made the election under Section 17-120.6.16    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 17or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 18anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 19entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 20"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's, 21surviving spouse's, or disability benefits.22    (b) If an employer has elected to provide funding for an 23accelerated pension benefit program, then as soon as practical 24after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical after the employer 25has made that election, whichever is later, the Fund shall   SB3404 Engrossed- 73 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 2adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 3for each eligible person who requests that information and 4shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 5irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the Fund 6to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 7benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 8shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 9receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 10subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 11person is limited to one calculation and offer per fiscal 12year. The Fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 13eligible person to notify him or her of the election.14    Until June 30, 2028, an eligible person may irrevocably 15elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 16amount that the Fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 17receiving any pension benefit. A person who elects to receive 18an accelerated pension benefit payment under this Section may 19not elect to proceed under the Retirement Systems Reciprocal 20Act with respect to service under this Article.21    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 22be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 23pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 24benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 25terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 26survivor, or other benefit.  SB3404 Engrossed- 74 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 2benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 3under this Article, then:4        (1) Any benefits under the Fund earned as a result of 5    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 6    person's creditable service arising from the return to 7    active service.8        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 9    repaid to the Fund, and the terminated creditable service 10    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.11    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 12benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 13be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 14account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 15Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 16taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 17receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 18Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 19rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 20under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.21    (f) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 22receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 23Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 24of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 25from the contribution remitted by the employer for that 26purpose. Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of the   SB3404 Engrossed- 75 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1accelerated pension benefit program must be kept in a separate 2account. If the Fund determines it does not have sufficient 3moneys to make the accelerated pension benefit payment, then 4the Fund shall not accept the member's irrevocable election 5and shall notify the member of that fact. The member may 6reapply for the accelerated pension benefit payment after that 7fiscal year. Elections shall be processed and paid in the 8order in which complete applications are received by the Fund, 9subject to the availability of funds. If the Fund accepts the 10member's irrevocable election to receive an accelerated 11pension benefit payment under this Section, then the Fund 12shall transfer, from the moneys remitted to the Fund for that 13purpose, the amount of the accelerated pension benefit payment 14into the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified 15account. If any moneys remain in the account maintained by the 16Fund for the purpose of the accelerated pension benefit 17program at the end of the fiscal year, the Fund must remit 18those moneys back to the employer within one month after the 19end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies the Fund 20at least one month before the end of the fiscal year that the 21funds shall remain in the account to be used for the subsequent 22fiscal year.23    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 24rules, necessary to implement this Section.25    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 26way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan   SB3404 Engrossed- 76 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 2    (40 ILCS 5/17-120.6 new)3    Sec. 17-120.6. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 4reduction in annual retirement annuity and surviving spouse's 5annuity increases. 6    (a) As used in this Section:7    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump sum 8payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 9the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 10annuity and surviving spouse's annuity using the formula 11applicable to the Tier 1 member and the present value of the 12automatic annual increases to the Tier 1 member's retirement 13annuity using the formula provided under subsection (b-5) and 14surviving spouse's annuity using the formula provided under 15subsection (b-6). "Eligible person" means a person who:16        (1) is a Tier 1 member;17        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 18    annuity under this Article;19        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 20    receiving a retirement annuity under this Article;21        (4) has not received any retirement annuity under this 22    Article; and23        (5) has not made the election under Section 17-120.5.24    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a 25participant under this Article or any reciprocal retirement   SB3404 Engrossed- 77 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1system or pension fund established under this Code before 2January 1, 2011.3    (b) Until June 30, 2028, if an employer elects to provide 4funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, then as 5soon as practical after June 30, 2026 or as soon as practical 6after the employer makes that election, whichever is later, 7the Fund shall implement an accelerated pension benefit 8payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request of an 9eligible person, if the employer has elected to provide 10funding for an accelerated pension benefit program, the Fund 11shall calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 12adopted by the Board, an accelerated pension benefit payment 13amount and shall offer that eligible person the opportunity to 14irrevocably elect to have his or her automatic annual 15increases in retirement pension calculated in accordance with 16the formula provided under subsection (b-5) in exchange for 17the accelerated pension benefit payment. The election under 18this subsection must be made before the eligible person 19receives the first payment of a retirement pension otherwise 20payable under this Article. An eligible person is limited to 21one calculation and offer per fiscal year.22    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 23retirement annuity of a person who made the election under 24subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 25January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 26or the first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever   SB3404 Engrossed- 78 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 2the originally granted retirement annuity.3    (b-6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 4surviving spouse's annuity payable to a surviving spouse's 5annuity beneficiary of a person who made the election under 6subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 7January 1 occurring on or after the first anniversary of the 8commencement of the annuity. Each annual increase shall be 9calculated at 1.5% of the originally granted surviving 10spouse's annuity.11    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 12benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 13then:14        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 15    increase in retirement annuity shall be calculated in 16    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 17    (b-5); and18        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 19    repaid to the Fund.20    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 21benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 22be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 23account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 24Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 25taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 26receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this   SB3404 Engrossed- 79 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 2rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 3under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.4    (d-5) Before accepting a member's irrevocable election to 5receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 6Section, the Fund shall verify that it has a sufficient amount 7of moneys to pay for the accelerated pension benefit payment 8from the contribution remitted by the employer for that 9purpose. Moneys remitted to the Fund for the purpose of this 10program must be kept in a separate account. If the Fund 11determines it does not have sufficient moneys to make the 12accelerated pension benefit payment, then the Fund shall not 13accept the member's irrevocable election and shall notify the 14member of that fact. The member may reapply for the 15accelerated pension benefit payment after that fiscal year. 16Elections shall be processed and paid in the order in which 17complete applications are received by the Fund, subject to the 18availability of funds. If the Fund accepts the member's 19irrevocable election to receive an accelerated pension benefit 20payment under this Section, then the Fund shall transfer, from 21the moneys remitted to the Fund for that purpose, the amount of 22the accelerated pension benefit payment into the member's 23eligible retirement plan or qualified account. If any moneys 24remain in the account at the end of the fiscal year, the Fund 25must remit those moneys back to the employer within one month 26after the end of the fiscal year, unless the employer notifies   SB3404 Engrossed- 80 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1the Fund at least one month before the end of the fiscal year 2that the funds shall remain in the account to be used for the 3accelerated pension benefit program for the subsequent fiscal 4year.5    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 6rules, necessary to implement this Section.7    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 8way that would cause the Fund to cease to be a qualified plan 9under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 10    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 113-14050 as follows: 12    (55 ILCS 5/3-14050 new)13    Sec. 3-14050. Accelerated pension benefit program; 14counties with more than 3,000,000 inhabitants.15    (a) The county board of a county of more than 3,000,000 16inhabitants may establish an accelerated pension benefit 17program for the pension funds established under Articles 9 and 1810 of the Illinois Pension Code. The accelerated pension 19benefit program shall provide eligible participants the option 20to elect an accelerated pension benefit payment in accordance 21with the applicable provisions of Articles 9 and 10 of the 22Illinois Pension Code authorizing accelerated pension benefit 23payments.24    (b) If the county elects to establish the accelerated   SB3404 Engrossed- 81 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1pension benefit program for a fiscal year beginning in 2026, 2the county must notify the pension fund and remit a 3contribution to the pension fund in an amount determined by 4the county at least 30 days before the program is to be 5implemented. If the county elects to establish the accelerated 6pension benefit program for a fiscal year beginning in 2027, 7the county shall remit to the pension fund, not later than 30 8days prior to the beginning of the fiscal year for which the 9accelerated pension benefit program is to be made available, a 10contribution to the pension fund in an amount determined by 11the county. The contribution shall constitute the total 12funding available to that pension fund for accelerated pension 13benefit payments for that fiscal year, and accelerated pension 14benefit payments shall be issued by the applicable pension 15fund in accordance with the provisions concerning accelerated 16pension benefit payment until the contributed amount is 17exhausted. The contribution for the accelerated pension 18benefit payments may be made using any lawful funding 19mechanism authorized under this Code, including, but not 20limited to: 21        (1) the issuance of bonds authorized under this Code; 22        (2) lawful appropriations from available county 23    revenues; 24        (3) transfers from lawfully available funds; or 25        (4) any combination thereof. 26    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to expand or   SB3404 Engrossed- 82 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1limit the county's authority to issue bonds beyond those 2otherwise provided in this Code. 3    At least one month prior to the end of the fiscal year, the 4county must notify the pension fund if the county would desire 5any remaining moneys to be rolled over into the next fiscal 6year for the accelerated pension benefit program. If the 7county does not notify the pension fund, the moneys shall be 8remitted back to the county. If an accelerated pension benefit 9program is not authorized under the applicable Article of the 10Illinois Pension Code for the following fiscal year, then the 11pension fund shall remit the moneys back to the county.12    (c) This Section shall be construed as supplemental to 13existing county powers and shall not be interpreted to impair 14any existing contractual obligation or pension benefit 15protected under the Illinois Constitution.  16    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 17adding Section 10-4-13 as follows: 18    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-13 new)19    Sec. 10-4-13. Accelerated pension benefit program. 20    (a) The corporate authorities of a municipality may 21establish an accelerated pension benefit program for the 22pension funds established under Article 3, 4, 5, 6, 8, 11, or 2312 of the Illinois Pension Code to which the municipality 24contributes. The accelerated pension benefit program shall   SB3404 Engrossed- 83 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1provide eligible participants the option to elect an 2accelerated pension benefit payment with regard to employees 3of that municipality who participate in a pension fund 4established under Article 3, 4, 5, 6, 8, 11, or 12 of the 5Illinois Pension Code in accordance with the applicable 6provisions of the Illinois Pension Code authorizing 7accelerated pension benefit payments.8    (b) If the municipality elects to establish the 9accelerated pension benefit program for a fiscal year 10beginning in 2026, the municipality must notify the pension 11fund and remit a contribution to the pension fund in an amount 12determined by the municipality at least 30 days before the 13program is to be implemented. If the municipality elects to 14establish the accelerated pension benefit program for a fiscal 15year beginning in 2027, the municipality shall remit to the 16pension fund, not later than 30 days prior to the beginning of 17the fiscal year for which the accelerated pension benefit 18program is to be made available, a contribution to the pension 19fund in an amount determined by the municipality. The 20contribution shall constitute the total funding available to 21that pension fund for accelerated pension benefit payments for 22that fiscal year, and accelerated pension benefit payments 23shall be issued by the applicable pension fund in accordance 24with the provisions concerning accelerated pension benefit 25payment until the contributed amount is exhausted. The 26contribution for the accelerated pension benefit payments may   SB3404 Engrossed- 84 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1be made using any lawful funding mechanism authorized under 2this Code, including, but not limited to: 3        (1) the issuance of bonds authorized under this Code; 4        (2) lawful appropriations from available municipal 5    revenues; 6        (3) transfers from lawfully available funds; or 7        (4) any combination thereof. 8    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to expand or 9limit the municipality's authority to issue bonds beyond those 10otherwise provided in this Code. 11    At least one month prior to the end of the fiscal year, the 12municipality must notify the pension fund if it would desire 13any remaining moneys to be rolled over into the next fiscal 14year for the accelerated pension benefit program. If the 15municipality does not notify the pension fund, the moneys 16shall be remitted back to the municipality. If an accelerated 17pension benefit program is not authorized under the applicable 18Article of the Illinois Pension Code for the following fiscal 19year, then the pension fund shall remit the moneys back to the 20municipality.21    (c) This Section shall be construed as supplemental to 22existing municipal powers and shall not be interpreted to 23impair any existing contractual obligation or pension benefit 24protected under the Illinois Constitution.  25    Section 20. The School Code is amended by adding Section   SB3404 Engrossed- 85 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b134-89 as follows: 2    (105 ILCS 5/34-89 new)3    Sec. 34-89. Accelerated pension benefit program. 4    (a) The board may establish an accelerated pension benefit 5program for the pension fund established under Article 17 of 6the Illinois Pension Code. The accelerated pension benefit 7program shall provide eligible participants the option to 8elect an accelerated pension benefit payment with regard to 9teachers who participate under Article 17 of the Illinois 10Pension Code in accordance with the applicable provisions of 11Article 17 of the Illinois Pension Code authorizing 12accelerated pension benefit payments.13    (b) If the board elects to establish the accelerated 14pension benefit program for a fiscal year beginning in 2026, 15the board must notify the pension fund and remit a 16contribution to the pension fund in an amount determined by 17the board at least 30 days before the program is to be 18implemented. If the board elects to establish the accelerated 19pension benefit program for a fiscal year beginning in 2027, 20the board shall remit to the pension fund, not later than 30 21days prior to the beginning of the fiscal year for which the 22accelerated pension benefit program is to be made available, a 23contribution to the pension fund in an amount determined by 24the board. The contribution shall constitute the total funding 25available to that pension fund for accelerated pension benefit   SB3404 Engrossed- 86 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1payments for that fiscal year, and accelerated pension benefit 2payments shall be issued by the applicable pension fund in 3accordance with the provisions concerning accelerated pension 4benefit payment until the contributed amount is exhausted. The 5contribution for the accelerated pension benefit payments may 6be made using any lawful funding mechanism authorized under 7this Code, including, but not limited to: 8        (1) the issuance of bonds authorized under this Code; 9        (2) lawful appropriations from available municipal 10    revenues; 11        (3) transfers from lawfully available funds; or 12        (4) any combination thereof. 13    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to expand or 14limit the board's authority to issue bonds beyond those 15otherwise provided in this Code. 16    At least one month prior to the end of the fiscal year, the 17board must notify the pension fund if it would like any 18remaining moneys rolled over into the next fiscal year for the 19accelerated pension benefit program. If the board does not 20notify the pension fund, the moneys shall be remitted back to 21the board. If an accelerated pension benefit program is not 22authorized under Article 17 of the Illinois Pension Code for 23the following fiscal year, then the pension fund shall remit 24the moneys back to the board.25    (c) This Section shall be construed as supplemental to 26existing board powers and shall not be interpreted to impair   SB3404 Engrossed- 87 -LRB104 18864 RPS 32309 b1any existing contractual obligation or pension benefit 2protected under the Illinois Constitution.  3    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 4Section 8.50 as follows: 5    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)6    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 78 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 8the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 9Act of the 104th General Assembly. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.